Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4414.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 2, Chapter 22, 1st
Extraordinary Session, O.S.L. 2023 (74 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section
2903.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2903.1. A. The Oklahoma Homebuilder Program shall be
administered by the Oklahoma Housing Finance Agency (OHFA). The
program shall create more affordable single family housing units
across the State of Oklahoma. The program shall be a loan program
for homebuilders at interest rates as low as zero percent (0%),
Req. No. 16450 Page 1

prov iding loans to build single family housing units. The program
shall fund both urban and rural housing developments across the
state. The program shall give preference to applicants seeking to
build homes in communities that have been under a federally declared
natural disaster within the last twelve (12) months. Additionally,
participants in this program shall not be eligible for the Oklahoma
Affordable Housing Tax Credit as found in Section 2357.403 of Title
68 of the Oklahoma Statutes. OHFA may promulgate rules to
administer the Oklahoma Homebuilder Program. OHFA shall provide a
yearly report beginning July 1, 2024, to the Governor, the Speaker
of the Oklahoma House of Representatives, the President Pro Tempore
of the Oklahoma State Senate, the House Appropriations and Budget
Chair, and the Senate Appropriations Chair detailing how many awards
have been made and how many single family housing units have been
built to date, along with other program information deemed relevant
by OHFA.
B. OHFA shall create, utilize, and maintain a community housing
needs assessment tool in order to allocate funds under this program.
C. OHFA shall work with the Legislative Workforce Housing
Committee to administer and improve housing accessibility throughout
the state. This subsection shall cease to have the force and effect
of law on November 1, 2031.


Req. No. 16450 Page 2

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-16450 TKR 02/17/26





















Req. No. 16450 Page 3